cs: Materiál hřebenu harmoniky: Akryl; Akrylonitril butadien styren (ABS); Hliník; Bambus; Kompozit; Dřevo; Jiné
fr: Matériau du peigne d'harmonica: Acrylique; Acrylonitrile butadiène styrène (ABS); Aluminium; Bambou; Composite; Bois; Autre
pt-PT: Material do pente da harmónica: Acrílico; Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno (ABS); Alumínio; Bambu; Composto; Madeira; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal češlja harmonike: Akril; Akrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Aluminij; Bambus; Kompozit; Drvo; Ostalo
sv: Munspelskammens material: Akryl; Akrylnitrilbutadienstyren (ABS); Aluminium; Bambu; Komposit; Trä; Övrigt
vi: Chất liệu thân kèn harmonica: Acrylic; Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Nhôm; Tre; Composite; Gỗ; Khác
ro-RO: Materialul pieptenelui pentru muzicuță: Acrilic; Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Aluminiu; Bambus; Compozit; Lemn; Altele
es: Material del peine para la armónica: Acrílico; Acrilonitrilo butadieno estireno (ABS); Aluminio; Bambú; Material compuesto; Madera; Otro
pt-BR: Material do pente da gaita: Acrílico; Acrilonitrila butadieno estireno (ABS); Alumínio; Bambu; Composto; Madeira; Outro
ru: Материал гребенки гармоники: Акрил; Акрилонитрилбутадиенстирол (АБС-пластик); Алюминий; Бамбук; Композит; Дерево; Другое
bg-BG: Материал на гребена на хармониката: Акрил; Акрилонитрил бутадиен стирен (ABS); Алуминий; Бамбук; Композит; Дърво; Друго
el: Υλικό χτένας φυσαρμόνικας: Ακρυλικό; Ακρυλονιτρίλιο βουταδιένιο στυρένιο (ABS); Αλουμίνιο; Μπαμπού; Σύνθετο; Ξύλο; Άλλο
pl: Materiał korpusu harmonijki: Akryl; Akrylonitryl-butadien-styren (ABS); Aluminium; Bambus; Kompozyt; Drewno; Inny
zh-TW: 口琴琴格材質: 壓克力; 丙烯腈丁二烯苯乙烯 (ABS); 鋁; 竹; 複合材質; 木質; 其他
ko: 하모니카 콤 소재: 아크릴; 아크릴로니트릴 부타디엔 스티렌(ABS); 알루미늄; 대나무; 복합재; 목재; 기타
tr: Mızıka tarak malzemesi: Akrilik; Akrilonitril bütadien stiren (ABS); Alüminyum; Bambu; Kompozit; Ahşap; Diğer
it: Materiale del pettine dell'armonica: Acrilico; Acrilonitrile butadiene stirene (ABS); Alluminio; Bambù; Composito; Legno; Altro
sl-SI: Material glavnika ustne harmonike: Akril; Akrilonitril butadien stiren (ABS); Aluminij; Bambus; Kompozit; Les; Drugo
sk-SK: Materiál hrebeňa harmoniky: Akryl; Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Hliník; Bambus; Kompozit; Drevo; Iné
da: Materiale for mundharmonikas kam: Akryl; Acrylonitril-butadien-styren (ABS); Aluminium; Bambus; Komposit; Træ; Andet
nb: Materiale i munnspill-kam: Akryl; Akrylnitril-butadien-styren (ABS); Aluminium; Bambus; Kompositt; Tre; Annet
hu: Szájharmonika fésű anyaga: Akril; Akrilnitril-butadién-sztirol (ABS); Alumínium; Bambusz; Kompozit; Fa; Egyéb
fi: Huuliharpun kamman materiaali: Akryyli; Akryylinitriilibutadieenistyreeni (ABS); Alumiini; Bambu; Komposiitti; Puu; Muu
lt-LT: Lūpinės armonikėlės kamštelių medžiaga: Akrilas; Akrilnitrilo butadieno stirenas (ABS); Aliuminis; Bambukas; Kompozitas; Mediena; Kita
en: Harmonica comb material: Acrylic; Acrylonitrile butadiene styrene (ABS); Aluminum; Bamboo; Composite; Wood; Other
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำตัวหวีของฮาร์โมนิกา: อะคริลิก; อะคริโลไนไตรลบิวตาไดอีนสไตรีน (ABS); อะลูมิเนียม; ไม้ไผ่; คอมโพสิต; ไม้; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 口琴琴格材质: 亚克力; 丙烯腈丁二烯苯乙烯 (ABS); 铝; 竹制; 复合材料; 木制; 其他
de: Material des Kamms der Mundharmonika: Acryl; Acrylnitril-Butadien-Styrol (ABS); Aluminium; Bambus; Verbundwerkstoff; Holz; Sonstige
nl: Kammateriaal harmonica: Acryl; Acrylonitril-butadieen-styreen (ABS); Aluminium; Bamboe; Composiet; Hout; Overig
ja: ハーモニカコーム素材: アクリル; アクリロニトリルブタジエンスチレン (ABS); アルミニウム; 竹; コンポジット; 木材; その他